Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5082.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-95. Physical therapists.
(a) An individual or group health insurance plan or policy delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall not impose a copayment, coinsurance, or
office visit deductible amount charged to the insured for services rendered by a physical therapist
licensed under § 5-40-7 that is greater than the copayment, coinsurance or office visit deductible
amount charged to the insured for the services of a primary care physician or osteopath licensed
under chapter 37 of title 5.
(b) An insurer shall state clearly the availability of physical therapy coverage under its plan
and all related limitations, conditions, and exclusions.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-87. Physical therapists.
(a) An individual or group health insurance plan or policy delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall not impose a copayment, coinsurance, or
office visit deductible amount charged to the insured for services rendered by a physical therapist
licensed under § 5-40-7 that is greater than the copayment, coinsurance or office visit deductible

amount charged to the insured for the services of a primary care physician or osteopath licensed
under chapter 37 of title 5.
(b) An insurer shall state clearly the availability of physical therapy coverage under its plan
and all related limitations, conditions, and exclusions.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-83. Physical therapists.
(a) An individual or group health insurance plan or policy delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall not impose a copayment, coinsurance, or
office visit deductible amount charged to the insured for services rendered by a physical therapist
licensed under § 5-40-7 that is greater than the copayment, coinsurance or office visit deductible
amount charged to the insured for the services of a primary care physician or osteopath licensed
under chapter 37 of title 5.
(b) An insurer shall state clearly the availability of physical therapy coverage under its plan
and all related limitations, conditions, and exclusions.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-100. Physical therapists.
(a) An individual or group health insurance plan or policy delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall not impose a copayment, coinsurance, or
office visit deductible amount charged to the insured for services rendered by a physical therapist
licensed under § 5-40-7 that is greater than the copayment, coinsurance or office visit deductible
amount charged to the insured for the services of a primary care physician or osteopath licensed
under chapter 37 of title 5.
(b) An insurer shall state clearly the availability of physical therapy coverage under its plan
and all related limitations, conditions, and exclusions.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000572
========
LC000572 - Page 2 of 3